District of Columbia statutes.
44-108.03

Functional assessment.

Within 30 days prior to admission, the facility shall collect, on a standardized form approved by the Mayor, the following information regarding each applicant:

(1)

Level of functioning in activities of daily living including bathing, dressing, grooming, eating, toileting, and mobility;

(2)

Level of support and intervention, including any special equipment and supplies, required to compensate for the individual’s deficits in activities of daily living;

(3)

Current physical or psychological symptoms of the individual requiring monitoring, support, or other intervention by the ALR;

(4)

Capacity of the individual for making personal and healthcare related decisions;

(5)

Presence of disruptive behavior or behavior which presents a risk to the physical or emotional health and safety of self or others;

(6)

Social factors, including:

(A)

Significant problems with family circumstances and personal relationships;

(B)

Spiritual status and needs; and

(C)

Ability to participate in structured and group activities and the resident’s current involvement in such activities.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 803, 47 DCR 2647